Maryland, session 2025, SB0970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 14 – Howard County
3.107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “BUILDING” MEANS A STRUCTURE WITH EXTERIOR WALLS
THAT COMBINE TO FORM AN OCCUPIABLE STRUCTURE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0970*

SENATE BILL 970
(II) “BUILDING” DOES NOT INCLUDE A TEMPORARY
STRUCTURE, AS DEFINED IN THE HOWARD COUNTY BUILDING CODE.
(3) “NEW CONSTRUCTION” MEANS CONSTRUCTION OF A BUILDING
THAT REQUIRES A HOWARD COUNTY BUILDING PERMIT.
(B) WHEN DETERMINING THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF MANDATORY PARKING
SPACES FOR NEW CONSTRUCTION, THE HOWARD COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF
PLANNING AND ZONING SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER INFRASTRUCTURE FOR
PEDESTRIANS COULD OFFSET THE NEED FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF ANY PARKING
SPACES FOR THE NEW CONSTRUCTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.